Alabama, session 2026rs, HB353.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) ADVANCED MATH PATHWAY. A sequence of courses that
accelerates or combines content from different middle school
and high school grade levels, which culminates in students
taking Algebra I, or the integrated equivalent, in middle
Page 1

taking Algebra I, or the integrated equivalent, in middle
HB353 Engrossed
school and at least one college credit-bearing math course in
high school.
(2) DEPARTMENT. The State Department of Education.
(b) No later than the 2027-2028 school year, the
department shall develop an Advanced Math Pathway that is
designed to enable students to be prepared for and enroll in
Algebra I, or the integrated equivalent, in middle school and
college credit-bearing math courses in high school. Local
boards of education shall adopt a policy relating to the
automatic enrollment and shall automatically enroll in a
Middle School or High School Advanced Math Pathway a student
who:
(1) Scores proficient or at grade level or higher on
the statewide annual end-of-year math assessment in grades
five through eight; or
(2) Demonstrates proficiency using a local measure that
considers the student's math coursework or the student's grade
class ranking.
(c) Local school districts shall provide transparent
information to students and parents including, but not limited
to, all of the following:
(1) The impact of middle school and high school math
enrollment on the middle and high school math sequence.
(2) The purpose of the automatic enrollment policy.
(3) Information about the math pathways available to
students, including high school math pathway options.
(4) Information about how the math pathways prepare
students for post-secondary college and career opportunities.
Page 2

students for post-secondary college and career opportunities.
HB353 Engrossed
(d)(1) The parent or guardian of a student who does not
meet the criteria for automatic enrollment under subsection
(b) may opt the student into advanced math courses according
to criteria established by the local board of education.
(2) The parent or guardian of a student described by
subsection (b) may opt the student out of automatic enrollment
or have the student removed from the advanced math course
under that subsection.
(e) To ensure that students succeed in advanced math,
the local board of education and the school must provide
instructional support beyond the core math instruction. These
supports may include, but not be limited to, a specific
high-quality instructional program or a set of steps used to
help students improve in math.
(f) The department shall annually report to the
Legislature all of the following:
(1) The number of students who score proficient or at
grade level or higher on the statewide annual end-of-year math
assessment in grades five through eight, organized by school
and local school district for each student group.
(2) Of the students identified in subdivision (1), the
number and percentage of students who were:
a. Enrolled in advanced math courses the subsequent
year, including Algebra I or the integrated equivalent, in
middle school.
b. Enrolled in advanced math course in high school.
c. Not proficient or at grade level and opted in.
d. Automatically enrolled and opted out.
Page 3

d. Automatically enrolled and opted out.
HB353 Engrossed
(3) Math scores on the year-end statewide assessment by
grade level, grouped by each category of subdivision (2).
(4) A description of the Advanced Math Pathway offered
to middle school and high school students in each local school
district.
(5) A list of support offered at each school and local
school district and number and percent of students
participating in each support option.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 4

1, 2026.
HB353 Engrossed


House of Representatives
Read for the first time and referred ................29-Jan-26
to the House of Representatives
100 committee on Education Policy
101
102 Read for the second time and placed ................05-Feb-26
103 on the calendar:
104 0 amendments
105
106 Read for the third time and passed ................31-Mar-26
107 as amended
108 Yeas 103
109 Nays 0
110 Abstains 1
111
112
113 John Treadwell
114 Clerk
115
Page 5